Georgia statutes. TITLE 37 Mental Health
Article 1 General Provisions
37-2-6.5.
Cessation of operations by community service board; notification; continuation of operations by successor board, county board of health, or outside manager.

By joint action of the membership of a community service board created pursuant to Code Section 37-2-6 and the governing authority of each county within the community service board area, such community service board may cease operations; provided, however,
that such community service board shall notify the commissioner at least 90 days in advance of the meeting of the community service board in which such action is to be taken. Such joint action shall indicate the date on which the
community service board shall cease operations.

Upon receipt of notification that a community service board intends to cease operations, the commissioner shall notify the chairperson and executive director of such community service board and the governing authority of each county within the community
service board area of such board that:

The department, after securing the approval of the Governor, intends to appoint a manager or management team to manage and operate the programs and services of the community service board in accordance with the provisions of paragraph (1) of subsection
(c) of Code Section 37-2-10 until the department shall determine:

That such community service board should continue in operation, provided one or more members appointed to such board in accordance with subsection (b) of Code Section 37-2-6 shall be removed in accordance with subparagraph (c)(3)(H) of Code Section 37-2-10,
and the department, acting on behalf of the membership of the community service board, nominates a successor to a removed member and advises the county governing authority that appointed such removed member to appoint
a successor;

That all of the members of such community service board appointed in accordance with subsection (b) of Code Section 37-2-6 shall be removed and such community service board shall be reconstituted; and that the department shall assist the county governing
authorities in making appointments to the new community service board; or

In the case where the membership of such community service board is the membership of a county board of health designated in accordance with Code Section 31-3-12.1 or subsection (e) of Code Section 37-2-6, that the entire membership of the community service
board should be removed and the membership of the community service board be reconstituted in accordance with subsection (b) of Code Section 37-2-6;

The department, with the approval of the commissioner, intends to redesignate the boundaries of the community service board area served by such board pursuant to paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of Code Section 37-2-3 by expanding the boundaries of a community
service board area served by another community service board to include the counties in the community service board area served by the community service board that intends to cease operations so that the community service
board serving such area may assume responsibility for the provision of disability services within such counties;

The department intends to request pursuant to Code Section 31-3-12.1 that the governing authority of a county within the community service board area of such board authorize the membership of the board of health of such county to serve as the membership
of such community service board; or

The department, after securing the approval of the Governor, intends to appoint a manager or management team to manage and operate the programs and services of the community service board until such time as arrangements can be made to secure one or more
alternate service providers to assume responsibility for the provision of services previously provided by the community service board.

If a community service board ceases operation and is succeeded by another community service board pursuant to paragraph (2), a county board of health pursuant to paragraph (3), or a manager or management team pursuant to paragraph (4) of subsection (b)
of this Code section, the department shall make a determination about the disposition of all assets, equipment, and resources purchased with state or federal funding in the possession of the predecessor community service board.

If a community service board ceases operation and one or more alternate service providers assume responsibility for the provision of services previously provided by the community service board pursuant to paragraph (4) of subsection (b) of this Code section,
the department shall petition the superior court of the county in which the principal office of that community service board was located for appointment of a receiver of the assets of the community service board for the protection
of the board’s creditors and the public. The receiver shall be authorized to marshal and sell or transfer assets of the board, and, after payment of the costs, expenses, and approved fees of the proceeding, to pay the liabilities
of the community service board. The court shall then decree that the board be dissolved. Upon completion of the liquidation, any surplus remaining after paying all costs of the liquidation shall be distributed, as determined by
the court, to the agencies, entities, or providers providing disability services in the community service board area formerly served by the community service board which ceased operations. At no time shall any community service
board upon ceasing operations convey any of its property, except as may be otherwise authorized by a superior court in this subsection, to any private person, association, or corporation.

History. Code 1981, §

37-2-6.5

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 310, § 7/HB 1223; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-1/HB 228; Ga. L. 2010, p. 878, § 37/HB 1387; Ga. L. 2014, p. 309, § 7/SB 349.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 310, § 10/HB 1223, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Nothing in this Act shall be construed to affect or abate any right accrued or vested prior to July 1, 2006, or any action or proceeding commenced prior to July 1,
2006, under any law amended or repealed by this Act.”

Ga. L. 2006, p. 310, § 11/HB 1223, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that those provisions of that Act which authorize community service boards to amend their bylaws and authorize county governing authorities to appoint no sooner than May
1, 2006, any community service board members to take office on July 1, 2006, shall become effective April 21, 2006.

37-2-7.
Formulation and publication of state plan for disability services.

The department shall formulate and publish in print or electronically biennially a state plan for disability services which shall take into account the disability services plans submitted by the regional offices as required by Code Section 37-2-5.2. The
state disability services plan shall be comprehensive and shall include public and private institutional and community services to the disabled. In developing the state plan, the department shall request input from the regional
offices and planning boards, the community service boards, hospitals, and other public and private providers. The plan shall include an overview of current services and programs and shall also present information on future program,
service, educational, and training needs.

The plan shall address ways of eliminating, to the extent possible, detrimental delays and interruptions in the administration of disability services when moving an individual from one element of service to another in order to ensure continuity of care
and treatment for persons receiving such services.

The plan shall further set forth the proposed annual budget of the department and the regions.

The plan shall be submitted to the department, the Governor, the General Assembly, the council, the regional planning boards, the hospitals, the community service boards, and any other public or private provider requesting a copy of the plan.

At such time as the state plan is submitted, the department shall further submit an analysis of services provided, programs instituted, progress made, and the extent of implementation of the previous biennial plan. Such analysis shall measure the effectiveness
and the efficiency of the methods of delivering services which ameliorate or prevent disability and restore health. This analysis shall further address the efforts of the department in coordinating services in accordance with Code
Section 37-2-9.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-606, enacted by Ga. L. 1976, p. 953, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1213, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 16; Ga. L. 1999, p. 860, § 2; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1324, § 1-7; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-1/HB 228; Ga. L. 2010, p. 838,
§ 10/SB 388.

Code Commission notes.

Ga. L. 1999, p. 860, § 2, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that subsection (b.1) becomes effective only when funds are specifically appropriated for the purposes of subsection (b.1) in an Appropriations Act making specific reference to this
Act. Funds were not appropriated in the 1999, 2000, or 2001 session. The contingent enactment of subsection (b.1) has been treated as superseded by Ga. L. 2002, p. 1324, § 1-7, which rewrote this article.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 18.1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “Nothing in this Act shall be construed to repeal any provision of Chapter 5 of Title 37 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, the ‘Community Services Act for the Mentally
Retarded.’ ”

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 19, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 1994; provided, however, that provisions relating to the establishment of regional and community service board boundaries and the appointments
of regional boards and community service boards shall become effective on July 1, 1993, or upon whatever date is stipulated in the Act and provided, further, that the provisions authorizing a county board of health to agree to serve
as the lead county board of health for only that county shall become effective upon the approval of this Act by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval.” The Act was approved by the Governor on April 27, 1993.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, which amends this Code section, provides, in § 19.1, not codified by the General Assembly, that the amendment is repealed on June 30, 1999; however, Ga. L. 1998, p. 870, § 1, struck § 19.1 of Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, which would have
repealed the 1993 amendment to this Code section.

37-2-8.
[Reserved] Unification of state and area service programs.

History.
Repealed by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 16, effective July 1, 1994.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section was based on Code 1933, § 88-608, enacted by Ga. L. 1976, p. 953, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1213, § 1.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, which repeals and reserves this Code section, provides in § 19.1, not codified by the General Assembly, that the repeal is itself repealed on June 30, 1999.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, which amends this Code section, provides, in § 19.1, not codified by the General Assembly, that the amendment is repealed on June 30, 1999; however, Ga. L. 1998, p. 870, § 1, struck § 19.1 of Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, which would have
repealed the 1993 amendment to this Code section.

37-2-9.
Coordination of disability services with related activities of other agencies and organizations.

To the maximum extent possible, disability services provided by the department and the regional offices, hospitals, community service boards, and other public and private providers shall be coordinated with related activities of the department and judicial,
correctional, educational, social, and other health service agencies and organizations, both private and public.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-609, enacted by Ga. L. 1976, p. 953, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1213, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 16; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1324, § 1-7; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-1/HB 228.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 18.1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “Nothing in this Act shall be construed to repeal any provision of Chapter 5 of Title 37 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, the ‘Community Services Act for the Mentally
Retarded.’ ”

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 19, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 1994; provided, however, that provisions relating to the establishment of regional and community service board boundaries and the appointments
of regional boards and community service boards shall become effective on July 1, 1993, or upon whatever date is stipulated in the Act and provided, further, that the provisions authorizing a county board of health to agree to serve
as the lead county board of health for only that county shall become effective upon the approval of this Act by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval.” The Act was approved by the Governor on April 27, 1993.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, which amends this Code section, provides, in § 19.1, not codified by the General Assembly, that the amendment is repealed on June 30, 1999; however, Ga. L. 1998, p. 870, § 1, struck § 19.1 of Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, which would have
repealed the 1993 amendment to this Code section.

37-2-9.1.
Compliance by regional planning boards and community service boards with laws as to open meetings and inspection of records; advisory boards.

Each regional planning board and community service board shall comply with the provisions of Chapter 14 of Title 50, relating to open and public meetings, and Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50, relating to inspection of public records, except where
records or proceedings are expressly made confidential pursuant to other provisions of law.

Each regional office and community service board and other public and private providers are authorized to establish one or more advisory boards for the purpose of ensuring coordination with various agencies and organizations and providing professional
and other expert guidance.

History. Code 1981, §

37-2-9.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 16; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1324, § 1-7; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-1/HB 228.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 18.1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “Nothing in this Act shall be construed to repeal any provision of Chapter 5 of Title 37 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, the ‘Community Services Act for the Mentally
Retarded.’ ”

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 19, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 1994; provided, however, that provisions relating to the establishment of regional and community service board boundaries and the appointments
of regional boards and community service boards shall become effective on July 1, 1993, or upon whatever date is stipulated in the Act and provided, further, that the provisions authorizing a county board of health to agree to serve
as the lead county board of health for only that county shall become effective upon the approval of this Act by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval.” The Act was approved by the Governor on April 27, 1993.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, which enacts this Code section, provides, in § 19.1, not codified by the General Assembly, that this Code section is repealed on June 30, 1999; however, Ga. L. 1998, p. 870, § 1, struck § 19.1 of Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, which would
have repealed this Code section.

37-2-10.
Commissioner’s emergency powers upon failure of community service board to establish and administer programs.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of the law, the commissioner with the concurrence of the Governor is authorized to establish and administer community programs on an emergency basis in the event one or more community service boards or their respective
governing boards fail to assume responsibility for the establishment and implementation of an adequate range of disability services or to provide appropriate disability services as determined by the department or substantially
breach their contracts with the department pursuant to this chapter.

Upon notification by a governing board of a community service board of an inability to provide an adequate range of disability services or to provide appropriate services, the commissioner, with concurrence of the Governor, may:

Assume responsibility for the administration and operation of all of the community programs operated by or through such board and, in which case, the programs shall become department programs; the department shall acquire the assets of the community service
board; the community service board employees shall become employees of the department; and the governing board of the community service board shall be dissolved; or

Assume responsibility for the administration and operation of one or more of the community programs operated by or through such board, in which case, such program or programs shall become a department program or programs; the department shall acquire
those assets of the community service board assigned to such program or programs; and the employees of such program or programs shall become employees of the department. Any community service board programs not transferred
to the department shall continue to be operated by the governing board of the community service board and the employees for such programs shall remain community service board employees.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of the law, the commissioner with the concurrence of the Governor is authorized to appoint a manager or management team to manage and operate the programs and services of the community service board if the commissioner
finds that the community service board:

Provides notice pursuant to Code Section 37-2-6.5 that the community service board intends to cease operations;

Intentionally, recklessly, or negligently failed to discharge its duties pursuant to a contract with the department;

Misused state or federal funds;

Engaged in a fraudulent act, transaction, practice, or course of business;

Endangered the life, safety, or health of a consumer served by the community service board;

Failed to keep fiscal records and maintain proper control over its assets;

Failed to respond to a substantial deficiency in a review or audit;

Otherwise substantially failed to comply with this chapter or the rules or standards of the department; or

In order to carry out the provisions of paragraph (1) of this subsection, the commissioner shall give written notice to the governing board of the community service board regarding the appointment of a manager or management team and the circumstances
on which the appointment is based. The governing board of the community service board shall be immediately suspended upon the appointment of a manager or management team by the commissioner. The commissioner may require
the community service board to pay costs incurred by the manager or management team.

Subject to the determination of the commissioner, a manager or management team appointed pursuant to this subsection may:

A manager or management team appointed pursuant to this subsection may not use or dispose of any asset or funds contributed to the community service board by the governing authority of a county or municipal corporation without the approval of such governing
authority.

A manager or management team appointed pursuant to this subsection shall be free from all liability, joint or several, for the manager or management team’s acts, omissions, and conduct and for the acts, omissions, and conduct of their duly constituted
agents in the administration of the community service board or its programs. The state shall indemnify and save them, and each of them, harmless from the effects and consequences of their acts, omissions, and conduct in
their official capacity, except to the extent that such effects and consequences shall result from their own willful misconduct.

If a manager or management team is appointed pursuant to this Code section, the department may:

Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit the department from canceling a contract with a community service board.

No longer has the fiscal ability to continue to provide contracted services and, without the intervention of the department, continued provision of disability services or health services to consumers in the service area is in immediate jeopardy.

Evaluate, redesign, modify, administer, supervise, or monitor a procedure, operation, or the management of the community service board;

Hire, supervise, discipline, reassign, or terminate the employment of an employee of the community service board;

Reallocate the resources and manage the assets of the community service board;

Require that a financial transaction, expenditure, or contract for goods and services be approved by the manager or management team;

Redesign, modify, or terminate a program or service of the community service board;

Direct the executive director, chief financial officer, or any other administrative or program manager, employee, or agent to take an action;

Exercise a power, duty, authority, or function of the community service board or its governing board as authorized by this chapter;

Recommend to the commissioner the removal of a member or members of the governing board of the community service board or the executive director of the community service board; and the provisions of any law to the contrary notwithstanding, the commissioner
may remove such member or executive director from office. If the commissioner removes a member or members of the governing board of the community service board pursuant to this subparagraph, the member or members so removed
shall be replaced pursuant to Code Section 37-2-6; and

Report at least monthly to the commissioner on actions taken.

Upon a determination that the conditions that gave rise to the appointment of a manager or management team pursuant to this subsection have been met and that such manager or management team is no longer necessary, terminate the authority delegated to
such manager or management team and restore authority to the governing board of the community service board to manage and operate the services and programs of the community service board; or

Operate and manage the programs of the community service board until such time as arrangements can be made to secure one or more alternate service providers to assume responsibility for the provision of services previously provided by the community service
board. If this option is exercised, the department shall petition the appropriate superior court for appointment of a receiver pursuant to subsection (d) of Code Section 37-2-6.5.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-610, enacted by Ga. L. 1976, p. 953, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1213, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 16; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1324, § 1-7; Ga. L. 2006, p. 310, § 8/HB 1223; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-1/HB 228; Ga. L. 2010,
p. 878, § 37/HB 1387; Ga. L. 2014, p. 309, § 8/SB 349; Ga. L. 2015, p. 385, § 7-2/HB 252.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 18.1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “Nothing in this Act shall be construed to repeal any provision of Chapter 5 of Title 37 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, the ‘Community Services Act for the Mentally
Retarded.’ ”

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 19, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 1994; provided, however, that provisions relating to the establishment of regional and community service board boundaries and the appointments
of regional boards and community service boards shall become effective on July 1, 1993, or upon whatever date is stipulated in the Act and provided, further, that the provisions authorizing a county board of health to agree to serve
as the lead county board of health for only that county shall become effective upon the approval of this Act by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval.” The Act was approved by the Governor on April 27, 1993.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, which amends this Code section, provides, in § 19.1, not codified by the General Assembly, that the amendment is repealed on June 30, 1999; however, Ga. L. 1998, p. 870, § 1, struck § 19.1 of Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, which would have
repealed the 1993 amendment to this Code section.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 310, § 10/HB 1223, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Nothing in this Act shall be construed to affect or abate any right accrued or vested prior to July 1, 2006, or any action or proceeding commenced prior to July 1,
2006, under any law amended or repealed by this Act.”

Ga. L. 2006, p. 310, § 11/HB 1223, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that those provisions of that Act which authorize community service boards to amend their bylaws and authorize county governing authorities to appoint no sooner than May
1, 2006, any community service board members to take office on July 1, 2006, shall become effective April 21, 2006.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 878, § 37(5)/HB 1387, which amended this Code section, purported to amend subparagraph (b)(5)(B), but actually amended subparagraph (c)(5)(B).

Ga. L. 2015, p. 385, § 1-1/HB 252, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘J. Calvin Hill, Jr., Act.’ ”

37-2-11.
Allocation of available funds for services; recipients to meet minimum standards; accounting for fees generated by providers; discrimination in providing services prohibited.

It is the goal of the State of Georgia that every citizen be provided an adequate level of disability care through a unified system of disability services. To this end, the department shall, to the maximum extent possible, allocate funds available for
services so as to provide an adequate disability services program available to all citizens of this state. In funding and providing disability services, the department and the regional offices shall ensure that all providers, public
or private, meet minimum standards of quality and competency as established by the department.

Fees generated, if any, by hospitals, community service boards, and other private and public providers, providing services under contract or purview of the department, shall be reported to the department and applied wherever appropriate against the cost
of providing, and increasing the quantity and quality of, disability services; provided, however, that income to a community service board derived from fees may be used to further the purposes of such community service board as
found in Code Section 37-3-6.1, subject to appropriations. The department shall be responsible for developing procedures to properly account for the collection, remittance, and reporting of generated fees. The department shall
work with the community service boards and other public or private providers to develop an appropriate mechanism for accounting for the funds and resources contributed to local disability services by counties and municipalities
within the area. Such contributions are not required to be submitted to either the community service boards or the department; however, appropriate documentation and accounting entries shall make certain that the county or municipality
is credited, and if necessary compensated, appropriately for such contribution of funds or resources.

No person shall be denied disability services provided by the state as defined in this chapter based on age, gender, race, ethnic origin, or inability to pay; provided, however, unless otherwise prohibited by law or contract, providers of disability services
may deny nonemergency disability services to any person who is able to pay, but who refuses to pay. The department shall develop a state-wide sliding fee scale for the provision of disability services and shall promulgate standards
that define emergency disability services and refusal to pay.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-612, enacted by Ga. L. 1976, p. 953, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1213, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 16; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1324, § 1-7; Ga. L. 2006, p. 310, § 9/HB 1223; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-1/HB 228.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1993, “remittance,” was substituted for “remittance” in the second sentence of subsection (b).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 18.1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “Nothing in this Act shall be construed to repeal any provision of Chapter 5 of Title 37 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, the ‘Community Services Act for the Mentally
Retarded.’ ”

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 19, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 1994; provided, however, that provisions relating to the establishment of regional and community service board boundaries and the appointments
of regional boards and community service boards shall become effective on July 1, 1993, or upon whatever date is stipulated in the Act and provided, further, that the provisions authorizing a county board of health to agree to serve
as the lead county board of health for only that county shall become effective upon the approval of this Act by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval.” The Act was approved by the Governor on April 27, 1993.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, which amends this Code section, provides, in § 19.1, not codified by the General Assembly, that the amendment is repealed on June 30, 1999; however, Ga. L. 1998, p. 870, § 1, struck § 19.1 of Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, which would have
repealed the 1993 amendment to this Code section.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 310, § 10/HB 1223, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Nothing in this Act shall be construed to affect or abate any right accrued or vested prior to July 1, 2006, or any action or proceeding commenced prior to July 1,
2006, under any law amended or repealed by this Act.”

Ga. L. 2006, p. 310, § 11/HB 1223, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that those provisions of that Act which authorize community service boards to amend their bylaws and authorize county governing authorities to appoint no sooner than May
1, 2006, any community service board members to take office on July 1, 2006, shall become effective April 21, 2006.

37-2-11.1.
Venue in actions against community service board; representation by Attorney General; immunity; use of legal counsel; authority for indemnification, defense, and insurance.

Venue for the purpose of any action against a community service board shall be the county in which the principal office of the community service board is located. For purposes of this Code section, “principal office” shall be defined as the facility which
houses the executive director or other such top administrator for the community service board.

In any legal proceeding, a regional planning board or the regional office shall be considered a unit of the department and shall be afforded the assistance of legal counsel from the Attorney General.

The community service boards shall be public bodies but shall not be considered agencies of the state or any specific county or municipality. Such community service boards are public agencies in their own right and shall have the same immunity as provided
for counties. No county shall be liable for any action, error, or omission of a community service board. Notwithstanding any provisions of law to the contrary, and regardless of any provisions of law which grant employees
of the community service boards benefits under programs operated by the state or which deem them to be state employees only for purposes of those benefits, employees of the community service boards shall not be employees
of the state but shall be employees of the community service boards and, further, the state shall not be liable for any action, error, or omission of such employees.

A community service board may employ or contract for legal counsel to assist in performing its duties and shall be authorized to appoint legal counsel to represent the community service board and its employees. The community service board may exercise
any authority granted in Article 2 of Chapter 9 of Title 45, relating to the indemnification, defense, and insuring of members and employees of public bodies.

History. Code 1981, §

37-2-11.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 1761, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 16; Ga. L. 1994, p. 437, § 7; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1324, § 1-7; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-1/HB 228.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 18.1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “Nothing in this Act shall be construed to repeal any provision of Chapter 5 of Title 37 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, the ‘Community Services Act for the Mentally
Retarded.’ ”

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 19, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 1994; provided, however, that provisions relating to the establishment of regional and community service board boundaries and the appointments
of regional boards and community service boards shall become effective on July 1, 1993, or upon whatever date is stipulated in the Act and provided, further, that the provisions authorizing a county board of health to agree to serve
as the lead county board of health for only that county shall become effective upon the approval of this Act by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval.” The Act was approved by the Governor on April 27, 1993.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, which amends this Code section, provides, in § 19.1, not codified by the General Assembly, that the amendment is repealed on June 30, 1999; however, Ga. L. 1998, p. 870, § 1, struck § 19.1 of Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, which would have
repealed the 1993 amendment to this Code section.

Law reviews.

For article, “Torts,” see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 441 (2001).

For note, “Youngblood v. Gwinnett Rockdale Newton Community Service Board: The Sovereign Immunity of State Agencies Under the Georgia Constitution and the Georgia Tort Claims Act,” see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 967 (2002).

37-2-11.2.
Access by the department, Department of Human Services, Department of Public Health, Department of Community Health, or regional office to records of any program receiving public funds; confidentiality.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, to ensure the quality and integrity of patient and client care, any program receiving any public funds from, or subject to licensing, certification, or facility approval by, the department, the Department
of Human Services, the Department of Public Health, the Department of Community Health, or a regional office shall be required to provide the department or the appropriate regional office or both, upon request, complete access
to, including but not limited to authorization to examine and reproduce, any records required to be maintained in accordance with contracts, standards, or rules and regulations of the department, the Department of Human Services,
the Department of Public Health, or the Department of Community Health or pursuant to the provisions of this title.

Records obtained pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section shall not be considered public records and shall not be released by the department, the Department of Human Services, the Department of Public Health, the Department of Community Health,
or any regional office unless otherwise specifically authorized by law.

The community service board shall maintain a clinical record for each consumer receiving treatment or habilitation services from such board. The treatment of clinical records of consumers in receiving services for mental illness shall be governed by the
provisions of Code Section 37-3-166. The treatment of clinical records of consumers receiving habilitation services for developmental disabilities shall be governed by the provisions of Code Section 37-4-125. The treatment of clinical
records of consumers in treatment for addictive diseases shall be governed by the provisions of Code Section 37-7-166.

History. Code 1981, §

37-2-11.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 1059, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 16; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1324, § 1-7; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-1/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 5-24/HB 214.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 18.1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “Nothing in this Act shall be construed to repeal any provision of Chapter 5 of Title 37 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, the ‘Community Services Act for the Mentally
Retarded.’ ”

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 19, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 1994; provided, however, that provisions relating to the establishment of regional and community service board boundaries and the appointments
of regional boards and community service boards shall become effective on July 1, 1993, or upon whatever date is stipulated in the Act and provided, further, that the provisions authorizing a county board of health to agree to serve
as the lead county board of health for only that county shall become effective upon the approval of this Act by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval.” The Act was approved by the Governor on April 27, 1993.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, which amends this Code section, provides, in § 19.1, not codified by the General Assembly, that the amendment is repealed on June 30, 1999; however, Ga. L. 1998, p. 870, § 1, struck § 19.1 of Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, which would have
repealed the 1993 amendment to this Code section.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

37-2-12.
[Repealed] Construction of chapter to avoid conflict with federal laws.

History. Code 1981, §

37-2-12

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1213, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 16; repealed by Ga. L. 2002, p. 1324, § 1-7, effective July 1, 2002.